Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3522
Motor vehicle service contract; requirements.

No motor vehicle service contract shall be issued, sold, or offered for sale in this state unless:

(1) The motor vehicle service contract provider is insured under a motor vehicle service contract reimbursement insurance policy issued by an insurer authorized to do business in this state;

(2) True and correct copies of the motor vehicle service contract and the motor vehicle service contract reimbursement insurance policy have been filed with the director; and

(3) The contract conspicuously states:

(a) That the obligations of the motor vehicle service contract provider to the service contract holder are covered under the motor vehicle service contract reimbursement insurance policy; and

(b) The name and address of the issuer of the motor vehicle service contract reimbursement insurance policy.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 94;

Laws 2006, LB 875, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB188, § 1.